Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.044

Removal of one or more directors of a bank or holding company—Effect upon quorum—Procedure.

If at any time because of the removal of one or more directors under this chapter there shall be on the board of directors of a bank or holding company less than a quorum of directors, all powers and functions vested in or exercisable by the board shall vest in and be exercisable by the director or directors remaining until such time as there is a quorum on the board of directors. If all of the directors of a bank or holding company are removed under this chapter, the director shall appoint persons to serve temporarily as directors until such time as their respective successors take office.

[ 2014 c 37 s 177; 2010 c 88 s 23; 1994 c 92 s 66; 1977 ex.s. c 178 s 7. Formerly RCW 30.12.044.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 178: See note following RCW 30A.04.450.